apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="m/il__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eala</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cá/ith__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itear</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ith</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheadh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheadh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheadh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheann</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheann</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheann</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itheann</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfear</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfidh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfidh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfidh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfidh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfidh</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithfimid</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithidís</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithigí</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithimid</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithim</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithimis</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ith</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithim</l>
          <r>ith<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dé/ach__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acha</l>
          <r>ach<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>ach<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>ach<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iche</l>
          <r>ach<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fill/eadh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idh</l>
          <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teacha</l>
          <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fái/dh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>the</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>the</l>
          <r>dh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ao/n__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nta</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nta</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/iar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éire</l>
          <r>iar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éir</l>
          <r>iar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iara</l>
          <r>iar<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iar</l>
          <r>iar<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blao/sc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isce</l>
          <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>scanna</l>
          <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>scanna</l>
          <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sc</l>
          <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ciar"><i>c</i><par n="c/iar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="déach"><i>dé</i><par n="dé/ach__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="núicléach"><i>núiclé</i><par n="dé/ach__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aon"><par n="initial-a"/><i>o</i><par n="ao/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blaosc"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lao</i><par n="blao/sc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáidh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ái</i><par n="fái/dh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cáith"><par n="initial-c"/><i>á</i><par n="cá/ith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filleadh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ill</i><par n="fill/eadh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mil"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/il__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Criméach"><i>Crimé</i><par n="dé/ach__adj"/></e>
